Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.055

Disciplinary actions authorized.

The commission is authorized to impose the following disciplinary actions, in increasing order of severity: (a) Admonishment; (b) reprimand; or (c) censure. If the conduct of the judge or justice warrants more severe disciplinary action, the commission may recommend to the supreme court the suspension or removal of the judge or justice.

[ 1989 c 367 s 4.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—1989 c 367: See note following RCW 2.64.010.